New Mexico, session 2026, SB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. Section 15-3A-1 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1989, Chapter 363, Section 1) is amended to read: "15-3A-1. GOVERNOR'S RESIDENCE [ADVISORY COMMISSION] MANAGEMENT COMMITTEE--CREATED.-- A. There is created the "governor's residence [advisory commission] management committee", which shall be administratively attached to the general services department, consisting of: [B. The commission shall consist of five members selected as follows] (1) the governor or [his] the governor's designee; (2) the secretary of general services or [his] the secretary's designee from the facilities management division of the general services department; and (3) three members appointed by the governor [from a list of names submitted by the governor's mansion foundation, a nonprofit, charitable corporation of this state. The chairman of the commission shall be elected annually from among the commission membership] who shall be appointed as follows: (a) one member shall be appointed for a term of two years; one member shall be appointed for a term of three years; and one member shall be appointed for a term of four years; and (b) upon the expiration of a term of a member appointed by the governor pursuant to Subparagraph (a) of this paragraph, the next appointed member shall be appointed for a term of four years to maintain the staggered expiration dates. B. The chair of the committee shall be designated by the governor. C. Appointed members shall [serve for terms of four years each and vacancies in any appointed member's seat shall be filled for the remainder of the unexpired term in the same manner as the original appointment was made. D. Appointed members shall] receive no compensation but shall be paid per diem and mileage as provided for nonsalaried officers in the Per Diem and Mileage Act." SECTION 2. Section 15-3A-2 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1989, Chapter 363, Section 2) is amended to read: "15-3A-2. DUTIES AND POWERS.-- A. The governor's residence [advisory commission] management committee shall: (1) plan, assemble, dispose of and acquire furnishings, art, landscaping materials and plants and other decorations for the public areas of the official residence of the governor; (2) monitor and report on the status of maintenance of the governor's residence and recommend to the general services department and to the legislature actions necessary to repair, maintain and renovate the residence; (3) conduct a detailed inventory at the beginning of each governor's term and annually prepare and submit to the legislature, the governor and the general services department a written inventory of and a statement on the condition of these public furnishings, art decorations and other items of the residence, as well as a written statement on the condition of the residence as a whole; and (4) develop statewide interest in the residence and effect such measures as will enhance the governor's ability to provide appropriate hospitality to the visitors of the residence. B. The [commission] committee may: (1) utilize the assistance of individuals, the general services department, other state agencies and nonprofit charitable corporations in carrying out its duties; (2) accept on behalf of the state from any private or other public sources, money, gifts, donations and bequests for use by the [commission] committee in carrying out its duties; and (3) enter into public promotions of its endeavors and publish such materials as it deems appropriate to promote the purposes of the [commission] committee." SECTION 3. Section 15-3A-3 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1989, Chapter 363, Section 3) is amended to read: "15-3A-3. TRUST FUND CREATED.--There is created in the state treasury a permanent trust fund [which] that shall be known as the "governor's residence preservation fund". The fund shall consist of all gifts, donations and bequests of money to the governor's residence [advisory commission] management committee as well as any appropriations made to the [commission] committee. Earnings from the investment of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Expenditure of the fund shall be only for the purposes for which the [commission] committee was created and shall be paid to the [commission] committee upon vouchers signed by the [chairman] chair of the [commission] committee and warrants issued by the secretary of finance and administration." - 5 -